Tennessee, session 114, SB2426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-108, is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting:
(6) Provide an annual report by July 1 of each year to the governor and the
general assembly on the status of pre-kindergarten programs that includes, at a
minimum, the number, location, and types of providers of pre-kindergarten classrooms
and the number of at-risk children served. The department of education, office of early
learning shall publish the report on its website to provide public access to the report.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2426
012062
- 1 -